Georgia, session 2025_26, SB295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 8 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to State Board of Education under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended
by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-245.
(a) By August 1, 2026, each local school system shall maintain a contract registry that
includes a complete record of all contracts, agreements, and other financial obligations by
any other name in an amount greater than $10,000.00, if such contract, agreement, or other
S. B. 295
- 1 -

LC 49 2271
obligation is paid for or otherwise financed in whole or in part using state funds. Such
contract registry shall be prominently posted and readily searchable on the local school
system's public website. Such contract registry shall include the information required in
subsection (b) of this Code section.
(b) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Education shall create a template for local
school systems' contract registries required by this Code section. Such template shall
provide for the contract registry to include the information relevant to the public's right to
know how tax dollars are being spent or obligated, to whom and for what purposes such
tax dollars are being obligated, and shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Name of the contracting entity, contractor, vendor, or payee;
(2) Contract initiation and end dates;
(3) Contract renewal and extension options, if any;
(4) Contract payment terms;
(5) Total contract amount or obligation;
(6) Contract funding source or sources;
(7) Contract spending category;
(8) A brief description of the purpose of the contract, including, but not limited to, what
goods, services, and other things of value are being purchased, leased, received, or
otherwise procured;
(9) Whether the contract was competitively procured, and if not, an explanation for why
competitive procurement was not used or required;
(10) The names of each officer of the contracting entity, contractor, vendor, or payee and
of each individual who signed or otherwise executed the contract on behalf of the
contracting entity, contractor, vendor, or payee;
(11) Whether any individual identified pursuant to paragraph (10) of this subsection, or
any individuals lobbying for such contracting entity, contractor, vendor, or payee, was
S. B. 295
- 2 -

LC 49 2271
employed by the local school system or its local board of education in the previous five
years; and
(12) Whether the local board of education or the local school system contracted with
such contracting entity, contractor, vendor, or payee in the previous five years, and if so,
when.
(c)(1) Each local school system's contract registry shall be regularly updated and not less
often than by August 1, November 1, February 1, and May 1 each year.
(2) Each local school system shall have no more than 60 days from the initiation of a
contract, agreement, and other financial obligation by any other name in an amount
greater than $10,000.00 to update its contract registry to include the information required
in subsection (b) of this Code section.
(d) By July 1, 2026, each local board of education shall establish policies to implement the
requirements of this Code section.
(e) If a local board of education fails to comply with any provision of this Code section,
compliance shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to Code Section 20-2-243.
(f) This Code section shall not be subject to waiver pursuant to Code Section 20-2-82 for
a strategic waivers school system or Code Section 20-2-2063.2 or 20-2-2065 for a charter
system."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 295
- 3 -